Tennessee, session 114, SB2210.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-38-507(b)(1), is amended by
deleting "twenty-four (24) hours" and substituting "thirty-six (36) hours".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2210
012580
- 1 -